Oklahoma, session 2025, SB34.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Access to


Lifesaving Medicines Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6970 of Title 36, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this section:


1. “Adjusted out-of-pocket amount” means the copayment,


coinsurance, or other cost-sharing obligation that a health benefit

Req. No. 679 Page 1


plan requires an insured to pay at the point of sale for a covered


prescription medication otherwise payable, less the pro rata portion


of any discounts, rebates, and price concessions in connection with


the prescription drug;


2. “Claim” means any bill, claim, or proof of loss made by or


on behalf of an insured or a provider to a health insurer or its


intermediary, administrator, or representative, with which the


provider has a provider contract for payment for health care


services under any health benefit plan;


3. “Excess cost burden” means any copayments, coinsurance, or


other cost-sharing an insured is required to pay at the point of


sale to receive a prescription drug or device that exceeds the


health insurer’s or pharmacy benefits manager’s net cost after


applying a pro rata portion of any discounts, rebates, or


concessions received from manufacturers, pharmacies, or other third


parties;


4. “Health benefit plan” means a health benefit plan as defined


pursuant to Section 6060.4 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


5. “Health care provider” or “provider” means a health care


provider as defined pursuant to Section 3090.2 of Title 63 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


6. “Health insurer” means any entity subject to the


jurisdiction of the Insurance Department and the insurance laws and


regulations of this state that contracts or offers to contract to

Req. No. 679 Page 2


provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for, or reimburse any of the


costs of health care services including, but not limited to, a


health maintenance organization, a health benefit plan, or any other


entity providing a plan of health insurance, health benefits, or


health care services;


7. “Maximum allowable claim” means the amount the health


insurer or pharmacy benefits manager has agreed to pay a pharmacy;


8. “Maximum allowable cost” means the maximum dollar amount


that a health insurer or its intermediary will reimburse a pharmacy


provider for a group of drugs rated as “A”, “AB”, “NR”, or “NA” in


the most recent edition of the Approved Drug Products with


Therapeutic Equivalence Evaluations, published by the United States


Food and Drug Administration, or similarly rated by a nationally


recognized reference;


9. “Pharmacy” means a pharmacy as defined pursuant to Section


353.1 of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


10. “Pharmacy benefits manager” means a pharmacy benefits


manager as defined pursuant to Section 6960 of Title 36 of the


Oklahoma Statutes;


11. “Point of sale” means the transaction in which goods or


services including, but not limited to, prescription medications,


medical devices, and medical supplies are sold to the consumer;


12. “Rebate” means:



Req. No. 679 Page 3


a. negotiated price concessions including, but not


limited to, base rebates and reasonable estimates of


any price protection rebates and performance-based


rebates that may accrue, directly or indirectly, to


the health insurer or pharmacy benefits manager as a


result of point-of-sale prescription medication claims


processing during the coverage year from a


manufacturer, dispensing pharmacy, or other party to


the transaction, or


b. reasonable estimates of any fees and other


administrative costs that are passed through to the


health insurer as a result of point-of-sale


prescription medication claims processing and serve to


reduce the health insurer’s prescription medication


liabilities for the coverage year; and


13. “Provider contract” means any contract between a health


care provider and a health insurer, or an insurer’s network,


provider panel, intermediary, or representative, relating to the


provision of health care services.


B. Any health insurer or pharmacy benefits manager that issues,


renews, or amends a health benefit plan with prescription drug


coverage shall not impose an excess cost burden on an insured.


C. When contracting with a health insurer or health benefit


plan to administer pharmacy benefits, a pharmacy benefits manager

Req. No. 679 Page 4


shall offer the health benefit plan the option of extending point-


of-sale rebates to enrollees of the plan.


D. Prescription drug cost-sharing for an insured shall be the


lesser of:


1. The applicable copayment for the prescription medication


that would be payable in the absence of this section;


2. The maximum allowable cost;


3. The maximum allowable claim;


4. The adjusted out-of-pocket amount as determined pursuant to


this section;


5. The amount an insured would pay for the prescription


medication if the insured purchased it without using his or her


health benefit plan or any other source of prescription medication


benefits or discounts; or


6. The amount the pharmacy will be reimbursed for the


prescription medication by the health insurer or pharmacy benefits


manager.


E. The Insurance Commissioner shall promulgate rules to


effectuate the provisions of this section.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-679 CAD 12/17/2024 10:51:28 AM





Req. No. 679 Page 5